District of Columbia statutes.
20-723

Subsequent account; supervised administration.

After an initial account has been rendered, subsequent accounts, whether filed by the same supervised personal representative or by a successor, shall contain:

(a)

the value of any assets in the possession or control of the personal representative as shown in the previous account;

(b)

the value of assets as shown in any inventory made since the previous account;

(c)

all receipts of the estate since the date of the previous account;

(d)

each purchase, sale, lease, transfer, compromise, settlement, disbursement and distribution of assets since the previous account, a description of each such transaction, and a statement of the amount by which it affects the amounts referred to in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c); and

(e)

the value of any remaining assets in the possession or control of the personal representative.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(pp), 42 DCR 63
This section is referenced in § 20-731 and § 20-732.
1981 Ed., § 20-723.
Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-701.01.